Utah statutes.
17-52-201.   Procedure for initiating adoption of optional plan --
Limitations -- Pending proceedings.
(1)  An optional plan proposing an alternate form of government for a county
may be adopted as provided in this chapter.
(2)  The process to adopt an optional plan establishing an alternate form of
county government may be initiated by:
(a)  the county legislative body as provided in Section 17-52-202; or
(b)  registered voters of the county as provided in Section 17-52-203.
(3) (a)  If the process to adopt an optional plan has been initiated under
Laws of Utah 1973, Chapter 26, Section 3, 4, or 5, or Section 17-52-202 or
17-52-203, the county legislative body may not initiate the process again
under Section 17-52-202 unless the earlier proceeding:
(i)  has been concluded by an affirmative or negative vote of registered
voters; or
(ii)  has not been concluded but has been pending for at least two years.
(b)  A county legislative body may not initiate the process to adopt an
optional plan under Section 17-52-202 within four years of an election at
which voters approved or rejected an optional plan proposed as a result of a
process initiated by the county legislative body.
(c)  Registered voters of a county may not initiate the process to adopt an
optional plan under Section 17-52-203 within four years of an election at
which voters approved or rejected an optional plan proposed as a result of a
process initiated by registered voters.
